California statutes. Education Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22110.1.

“Cash Balance Benefit Program” means the benefit program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan as set forth in Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22110.2.

“Credential,” “credentials,” and “certificate” mean any life diploma, credential, certificate, or other document provided for, by, and issued pursuant to the laws of the state that authorize service in the public school system of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22110.5.

“Certificated” means the holding by a person of a credential that is required by the laws of the state to be held as a condition to valid employment in the position in which the person is employed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22111.

“Child’s portion” or “children’s portion” means the amount of a disability allowance, disability retirement allowance, family allowance, or survivor benefit allowance payable for a dependent child or dependent children.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22112.5.

(a) “Class of employees” means a number of employees considered as a group because they are employed to perform similar duties, are employed in the same type of program, or share other similarities related to the nature of the work being performed.

(b) A class of employees may be comprised of one person if no other person employed by the employer performs similar duties, is employed in the same type of program, or shares other similarities related to the nature of the work being performed and that same class is in common use among other employers.

(c) The board shall have the right to override the determination by an employer as to whether or not a group or an individual constitutes a “class of employees” within the meaning of this section.

(d) The amendments to this section during the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be deemed to have become operative on July 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22112.6.

Notwithstanding Section 22112.5, any county office of education that, prior to January 1, 1997, operated a special education program for up to 225 days, and changes that program to a regular school term of not less than 180 school days with an extended school term of not more than 45 days effective July 1, 1998, may consider days of service in defining not more than two classes of employees, subject to the following:

(a) Members employed in the 225-day program prior to October 1, 1997, may remain in a class of employees for whom full-time service is 216 days per school term.

(b) Any of those members may
 elect to belong to a second class of employees for whom full-time service is fewer than 216 days per year, but not less than the minimum standard specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22138.5, if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The election is made on or before June 30, 1998, and is effective July 1, 1998.

(2) The election is nonrevocable.

(c) All certificated employees hired on or after October 1, 1997, shall belong to the class of employees specified in subdivision (b).

(d) This section shall not apply to certificated employees whose base school term is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 22138.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22113.

“Comparable level position” means any job in which the member can earn 6623 percent or more of indexed final compensation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22115.

(a) “Compensation earnable” means the sum of the following:

(1) The average annualized pay rate, which shall be determined as the quotient obtained when salary or wages, as described in Section 22119.2 or 22119.3, paid in a school year is divided by the service credited for that school year. The quotient shall not exceed the member’s highest annualized pay rate for that school year.

(2) Remuneration that is paid in addition to salary or wages, as described in Section 22119.2 or 22119.3, for the school year described in paragraph (1).

(b) If a member
 earns creditable compensation at multiple annualized pay rates during a school year and service credited at the highest annualized pay rate is at least 0.900 of a year, compensation earnable shall be determined as if all service credited for that year had been earned at the highest annualized pay rate.

(c) Compensation earnable excludes creditable compensation for which contributions are credited by the system to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(d) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22115.

(a) “Compensation earnable” means the sum of the following:

(1) The average annualized pay rate, which shall be determined as the quotient obtained when salary, as described in Section 22119.3, earned in a school year is divided by the service credited for that salary pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 22701. The quotient shall not exceed the member’s highest annualized pay rate for that school year.

(2) Special pay, as described in Section 22119.3, for the same school year referenced in paragraph (1).

(b) If a member earns
 salary at multiple annualized pay rates during a school year and service credited at the highest annualized pay rate is at least 0.900 of a year, compensation earnable shall be determined as if all salary for that year had been earned at the highest annualized pay rate.

(c) Compensation earnable excludes all supplemental pay and any creditable compensation for which contributions are credited by the system to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(d) Compensation earnable shall not exceed the limits described in Section 22317.5.

(e) This definition of “compensation earnable” reflects sound principles that support the integrity of the retirement fund. Those principles include, but are not limited to, consistent treatment
 of compensation earnable throughout a member’s career, consistent treatment of compensation earnable among an entire class of employees, consistent treatment of compensation earnable for the position, preventing adverse selection, and excluding from compensation earnable remuneration that is paid to enhance a member’s benefits. This definition is also consistent with the definition of “pensionable compensation” under Section 7522.34 of the Government Code for members who are subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(f) A presumption by the system that creditable compensation was paid or reported to enhance the member’s benefits may be rebutted by the member or by the employer on behalf of the member. Upon receipt of sufficient evidence to the contrary, a presumption by the system that creditable
 compensation was paid to enhance the member’s benefits may be reversed. 

(g) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 4.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22115.2.

“Concurrent membership” means membership in the Defined Benefit Program by an individual who is credited with service that is not used as a basis for benefits under any other public retirement system and is also a member of the California Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislators’ Retirement System, the University of California Retirement System, county retirement systems established under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code, or the San Francisco Employees’ Retirement System. A member with concurrent membership shall have the right to the following:

(a) Have final compensation determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section
 22134 or subdivision (d) of Section 22134.5.

(b) Redeposit accumulated retirement contributions pursuant to Section 23201.

(c) Apply for retirement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 5.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22115.5.

(a) “Concurrent retirement” entitles a member of the Defined Benefit Program to retire for service from the State Teachers’ Retirement System and from at least one of the retirement systems with which the member has concurrent membership, as defined in Section 22115.2, on the same date or on different dates provided that the member does not perform creditable service subject to coverage under the other system or the Defined Benefit Program between the two retirement dates.

(b) A retired member who is subsequently employed in a position subject to membership in a public retirement system, specified in Section 22115.2, shall not be eligible for concurrent retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22117.

“Contribution rate for additional service credit” means the contribution rate adopted by the board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program for the purchase of service credit. This rate shall be based upon the most recent valuation of the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program and increased to include any subsequently required contribution rates designated for funding subsequent allowance increases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22118.

“County” includes “city and county.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.

“County superintendent” means the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.2.

(a) “Creditable compensation” means the following remuneration that is paid in cash by an employer to all persons in the same class of employees for performing creditable service in that position:

(1) Salary or wages paid in accordance with a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a salary schedule or employment agreement.

(2) Remuneration that is paid in addition to salary or wages, provided it is paid to all persons who are in the same class of employees in the same dollar amount, the same percentage of salary or wages, or the same percentage of the amount being distributed.

(b) Creditable compensation shall include:

(1) Remuneration that is paid for the use of sick leave, vacation leave, or an employer-approved compensated leave of absence, except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).

(2) Member contributions that are picked up by an employer pursuant to Section 22903 or 22904.

(3) Amounts that are deducted from a member’s remuneration, including, but not limited to, deductions for participation in a deferred compensation plan; deductions to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and contributions to a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b),
 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(4) Any other payments the board determines to be “creditable compensation.”

(c) Any creditable compensation determined by the system to have been paid to enhance a member’s benefits shall not be credited under the Defined Benefit Program. Contributions on that compensation shall be credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program. A presumption by the system that creditable compensation was paid to enhance a member’s benefits may be rebutted by the member or by the employer on behalf of the member. Upon receipt of sufficient evidence to the contrary, a presumption by the system that creditable compensation was paid to enhance the member’s benefits may be reversed.

(d) “Creditable compensation” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) Remuneration that is not paid in cash or is not paid to all persons who are in the same class of employees.

(2) Remuneration that is paid for service that is not creditable service pursuant to Section 22119.5 or 22119.6.

(3) Remuneration that is paid in addition to salary or wages if it is not paid to all persons in the same class of employees in the same dollar amount, the same percentage of salary or wages, or the same percentage of the amount being distributed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(4) Remuneration that is paid in exchange for the relinquishment of
 unused accumulated leave.

(5) Payments, including, but not limited to, those for participation in a deferred compensation plan; to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and for contributions to a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code when the cost is covered by an employer and is not deducted from the member’s salary.

(6) Fringe benefits provided by an employer.

(7) Expenses paid or reimbursed by an employer.

(8) Severance pay, including lump-sum and installment payments, or money paid in excess of salary or wages to a member as
 compensatory damages or as a compromise settlement.

(9) Any other payments the board determines not to be “creditable compensation.”

(e) An employer or individual who knowingly or willfully reports compensation in a manner inconsistent with subdivision (a), (b), or (d) may be subject to prosecution for fraud, theft, or embezzlement in accordance with the Penal Code. The system may establish procedures to ensure that compensation reported by an employer is in compliance with this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, remuneration shall be considered paid if distributed to any person in the same class of employees who meets the qualifications or requirements specified in a publicly available written contractual agreement,
 including, but not limited to, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment agreement, as a condition of receiving the remuneration.

(g) This definition of “creditable compensation” reflects sound principles that support the integrity of the retirement fund. Those principles include, but are not limited to, consistent treatment of compensation throughout a member’s career, consistent treatment of compensation among an entire class of employees, consistent treatment of compensation for the position, preventing adverse selection, and excluding from compensation earnable remuneration that is paid to enhance a member’s benefits. The system shall determine the appropriate crediting of contributions between the Defined Benefit Program and the Defined Benefit Supplement Program according to these principles, to the extent not otherwise specified
 pursuant to this part.

(h) The section shall become operative on July 1, 2002.

(i) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(j) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 5.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.3.

(a) “Creditable compensation” for members who are subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 means the following remuneration that is paid in cash by an employer for performing creditable service in that position each pay period the creditable service is performed:

(1) Salary or wages.

(2) Remuneration that is paid in addition to salary or wages, only if it is paid to all persons who are in the same class of employees in the same dollar amount, the same percentage of salary or wages, or the same percentage of the amount being distributed.

(b) Creditable compensation shall be paid to all persons in the same class of employees in accordance with a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a salary schedule or employment agreement, and shall include:

(1) Remuneration that is paid for the use of sick leave, vacation leave, or an employer-approved compensated leave of absence, except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(2) Member contributions that are picked up by an employer pursuant to Section 22903 or 22904.

(3) Amounts that are deducted from a member’s remuneration, including, but not limited to, deductions for participation in a deferred compensation plan; deductions to purchase an annuity contract,
 tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and contributions to a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (6) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 7522.34 of the Government Code, remuneration that is paid for creditable service that exceeds one year in a school year.

(c) “Creditable compensation” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) Remuneration that is not paid in cash or is not paid to all persons who are in the same class of employees.

(2) Remuneration that is paid for service that is not creditable service pursuant to
 Section 22119.5 or 22119.6.

(3) Remuneration that is not paid each pay period in which creditable service is performed for that position.

(4) Remuneration that is paid in exchange for the relinquishment of unused accumulated leave.

(5) Payments, including, but not limited to, those for participation in a deferred compensation plan; to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and for contributions to a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code when the cost is covered by an employer.

(6) Fringe benefits provided by an employer.

(7) Expenses paid or reimbursed by an employer.

(8) Severance pay, including lump-sum and installment payments, or money paid in excess of salary or wages to a member as compensatory damages or as a compromise settlement.

(9) Creditable compensation determined by the system to have been paid to enhance a member’s benefit.

(10) Compensation paid to the member in lieu of benefits provided to the member by the employer or paid directly by the employer to a third party other than the system for the benefit of the member.

(11) Any one-time or ad hoc payments made to a member.

(12) Any employer-provided allowance, reimbursement, or payment, including, but not limited to, one made for housing, vehicle, or uniform.

(13) Any bonus paid in addition to compensation described in subdivision (a).

(14) Any other payments the board determines not to be
 “creditable compensation.”

(d) (1) Except for purposes of calculating credited service in the Defined Benefit Program and for reporting annualized pay rate on or after January 1, 2013, creditable compensation in any fiscal year shall not exceed:

(A) One hundred twenty percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a member whose service is not included in the federal system.

(B) One hundred percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a member whose service is
 included in the federal system pursuant to any changes in state or federal law enacted on or after January 1, 2013.

(2) The system shall adjust the limit based on the annual changes to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average, calculated by dividing the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February in the fiscal year preceding the adjustment by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February of the previous year rounded to the nearest thousandth. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 7522.10 of the Government Code, the adjustment shall be effective annually on July 1, beginning July 1, 2014.

(3) The Legislature reserves the right to modify the
 requirements of this subdivision with regard to all members subject to this subdivision, except that the Legislature may not modify these provisions in a manner that would result in a decrease in benefits accrued prior to the effective date of the modification.

(4) This subdivision shall apply to compensation paid during the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(e) An employer or individual who knowingly or willfully reports compensation in a manner inconsistent with subdivision (a), (b), or (c) may be subject to prosecution for fraud, theft, or embezzlement in accordance with the Penal Code. The system may establish procedures to ensure that compensation reported by an employer is in compliance with this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, remuneration shall be considered paid if distributed to any person in the same class of employees who meets the qualifications or requirements specified in a publicly available written contractual agreement, including, but not limited to, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment agreement, as a condition of receiving the remuneration.

(g) This definition of “creditable compensation” reflects sound principles that support the integrity of the retirement fund. Those principles include, but are not limited to, consistent treatment of compensation throughout a member’s career, consistent treatment of compensation among an entire class of employees, consistent treatment of compensation for the position, preventing adverse selection, and excluding from creditable compensation remuneration
 that is paid to enhance a member’s benefits. The system shall determine the appropriate crediting of contributions according to these principles, to the extent not otherwise specified pursuant to this part. A presumption by the system that creditable compensation was paid to enhance the member’s benefits may be rebutted by the member or by the employer on behalf of the member. Upon receipt of sufficient evidence to the contrary, a presumption by the system that creditable compensation was paid to enhance the member’s benefits may be reversed.

(h) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 6.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.3.

(a) “Creditable compensation” means the following remuneration that is paid in cash by an employer:

(1) “Base pay,” which shall be used exclusively to determine compensation earnable and shall meet all the following criteria:

(A) Is either of the following:

(i) Salary established pursuant to a publicly available pay schedule.

(ii) Special pay established pursuant to a publicly available agreement.

(B) Is paid for
 performing creditable service up to the full-time equivalent.

(C) Is paid to all persons in the same class of employees who meet the requirements specified in a publicly available pay schedule or publicly available agreement provided that those requirements are permitted by the board in accordance with regulations.

(D) Is not paid a limited number of times.

(E) Is not a bonus for members who are subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(2) “Supplemental pay” is any compensation that does not meet the criteria for base pay and is not otherwise excluded from this definition of creditable compensation pursuant to subdivision
 (c).

(b) Except as otherwise prohibited pursuant to subdivision (c), “creditable compensation” shall include:

(1) Remuneration that is paid for the use of sick leave, vacation leave, or an employer-approved compensated leave of absence, except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(2) Member contributions that are picked up by an employer pursuant to Section 22903 or 22904.

(3) Amounts that are deducted from a member’s remuneration, including, but not limited to, deductions for participation in a deferred compensation plan; deductions to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and contributions to a plan
 that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (6) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 7522.34 of the Government Code, remuneration that is paid for creditable service that exceeds one year in a school year.

(c) “Creditable compensation” does not mean and shall not include:

(1) Remuneration that is not paid in cash.

(2) Remuneration that is paid in exchange for the relinquishment of unused accumulated leave.

(3) Payments, including, but not limited to, those for participation in a
 deferred compensation plan; to purchase an annuity contract, tax-deferred retirement plan, or insurance program; and for contributions to a plan that meets the requirements of Section 125, 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 457(b), or 457(f) of Title 26 of the United States Code when the cost is covered by an employer.

(4) Fringe benefits provided by an employer.

(5) Expenses paid or reimbursed by an employer.

(6) Severance pay, including lump-sum and installment payments.

(7) Compensation paid in excess of base pay to a member as compensatory damages or as a compromise settlement.

(8) Creditable
 compensation determined by the system to have been paid to enhance a member’s benefit.

(9) Compensation paid to the member in lieu of benefits provided to the member by the employer or paid directly by the employer to a third party other than the system for the benefit of the member.

(10) Any employer-provided allowance, reimbursement, or payment, including, but not limited to, one made for housing, vehicle, or uniform.

(11) Any other payments the board determines not to be “creditable compensation.”

(d) Except for purposes of calculating credited service in the Defined Benefit Program and for reporting annualized pay rates, creditable compensation
 in any fiscal year shall not exceed the limits described in Section 22317.5.

(e) An employer or individual who knowingly or willfully reports compensation in a manner inconsistent with this section or Section 22104.8 may be subject to prosecution for fraud, theft, or embezzlement in accordance with the Penal Code. The system may establish procedures to ensure that compensation reported by an employer is in compliance with this section.

(f) This definition of “creditable compensation” is consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 22115.

(g) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined
 by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 7.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.5.

(a) “Creditable service” means any of the activities described in subdivision (b) performed for any of the following employers:

(1) A prekindergarten through grade 12 employer in a position with certification qualifications authorized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Section 44001.

(2) A community college employer by a faculty member, as defined in Section 87003, in an academic position, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87001, or by an educational administrator, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 87002, subject to the appropriate minimum standards adopted by the Board of Governors
 of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section 87356, or pursuant to a contract between a community college district and the United States Department of Defense to provide vocational training.

(3) A charter school employer under the provisions of an approved charter for the operation of a charter school for which the charter school is eligible to receive state apportionment.

(b) The types of activities are any of the following:

(1) The work of teachers, instructors, district interns, and academic employees employed in the instructional program for pupils, including special programs such as adult education, regional occupation programs, child care centers, and prekindergarten programs pursuant to Section 22161.

(2) Education or vocational counseling, guidance, and placement services.

(3) The work of employees who plan courses of study to be used in California public schools, or research connected with the evaluation or efficiency of the instructional program.

(4) The selection, collection, preparation, classification, demonstration, or evaluation of instructional materials of any course of study for use in the development of the instructional program in California public schools, or other services related to California public school curriculum.

(5) The examination, selection, in-service training, mentoring, or assignment of teachers, principals, or other similar
 personnel involved in the instructional program.

(6) The work of nurses, physicians, speech therapists, psychologists, audiologists, and other California public school health professionals.

(7) Services as a California public school librarian.

(8) Activities connected with the enforcement of the laws relating to compulsory education, coordination of child welfare activities involving the school and the home, and the school adjustment of pupils.

(9) The work of employees who are responsible for the supervision of persons or administration of the duties described in this subdivision.

(c) “Creditable service” also means any of the activities described in subdivision (b) when they are performed for an employer by:

(1) Superintendents of California public schools, and presidents and chancellors of community college employers.

(2) Consulting teachers employed by an employer to participate in the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44500) of Chapter 3 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(3) Audiometrists who hold a certificate of registration issued by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) “Creditable service” also means the performance of California
 public school activities related to, and an outgrowth of, the instructional and guidance program of the California public school when performed for the same employer for which the member is performing any of the activities described in subdivision (b) or (c).

(e) The board shall have final authority for determining creditable service to cover any activities not already specified.

(f) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 8.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.5.

(a) “Creditable service” means service in a position subject to membership. 

(b) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by
 the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 9.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22119.6.

(a) Creditable service shall also include any activities that do not meet the definition of creditable service under Section 22119.5, but were performed for any employer, as defined in Section 22131, on or before December 31, 2015, and were reported as creditable service to the system.

(b) The type of activities described in subdivision (a) performed by a member who becomes employed by the same or a different employer in a new position on or after January 1, 2016, shall be subject to Section 22119.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 5.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22120.

“Credited interest” means interest that is credited to active members’ and inactive members’ accumulated retirement contributions and accumulated annuity deposit contributions at a rate set annually by the board as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 6.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22121.

(a) “Credited service” means service for which the required contributions have been paid and service for which required contributions would have been paid in absence of the limit prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of Title 26 of the United States Code as described in Section 22317.5.

(b) “Credited service” for members who are subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 means service for which required contributions have been paid and service for which required contributions would have been paid in absence of the limit established by subdivision (d) of Section 22119.3.

(c) “Credited service” for
 the limited purpose of determining eligibility for benefits pursuant to Section 22134.5, 24203.5, or 24203.6 also includes up to two-tenths of one year of service granted pursuant to Section 22717.

(d) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed
 on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 10.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22121.

(a) “Credited service” means service for which the required contributions have been paid and service for which required contributions would have been paid in absence of the limits described in Section 22317.5.

(b) “Credited service” for the limited purpose of determining eligibility for benefits pursuant to Section 22134.5, 24203.5, or 24203.6 also includes up to two-tenths of one year of service granted pursuant to Section 22717.

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The
 date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 11.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22122.

“Custodian” as used in Section 22359, means any bank or trust company that serves as custodian for safekeeping, delivery, securities valuation, investment performance reporting, and other services in connection with investment of the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22122.4.

“Death payment” means the amount payable upon the death of a member pursuant to Section 23801, 23851, or 23880.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22122.5.

“Defined Benefit Program” means the Defined Benefit Program provided in the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan as set forth in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------
